Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 2 Guardians of Minors

Cross references.

Attorneys and guardians ad litem, § 15-11-98.

Child custody proceedings generally, §

19-9-1

et seq.

Claim by guardian or trustee of mental incompetent or minor, §

34-9-85

.

Appointment of guardian for minor for purposes of administering workers’ compensation benefits to which minor is entitled, §

34-9-226

.

Rights and privileges of patients, and their representatives, T. 37, C. 3, Art. 6.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides:
“all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

Law reviews.

For article, “The Georgia Law of Insanity,” see 3 Ga. B. J. 28 (1941).

For note on 1995 amendments of sections in this chapter, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 216 (1995).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 64 Mercer L. Rev. 325 (2012).